cs: Disciplína sportovního šermu: Fleret; Historický (HEMA); LARP; Šavle; Univerzální / více disciplín; Kord; Jiné
pt-BR: Modalidade de esgrima: Florete; Histórica (HEMA); LARP; Sabre; Universal/múltipla; Espada; Outra
hr-HR: Disciplina mačevanja: Floret; Povijesno (HEMA); LARP; Sablja; Univerzalno / višestruko; Mač; Ostalo
hu: Vívóműfaj: Tőr; Történelmi (HEMA); LARP; Kard; Univerzális/többféle; Párbajtőr; Egyéb
zh-CN: 击剑项目: 花剑; 历史武术 (HEMA); 实况角色扮演 (LARP); 佩剑; 通用/多种; 重剑; 其他
pt-PT: disciplina de esgrima: Florete; Histórico (HEMA); LARP; Sabre; Universal/múltiplo; Espada; Outro
es: Disciplina de esgrima: Florete; Histórico (HEMA); LARP; Sable; Universal/múltiple; Espada; Otra
en: Fencing discipline: Foil; Historical (HEMA); LARP; Sabre; Universal/multiple; Épée; Other
nl: Schermdiscipline: Floret; Historisch (HEMA); LARP; Sabel; Universeel/meerdere; Degen; Overig
zh-TW: 擊劍項目: 鈍劍; 史實歐洲武術 (HEMA); 實境角色扮演 (LARP); 軍刀; 通用/多種; 銳劍; 其他
el: Πειθαρχία ξιφασκίας: Ξίφος ασκήσεως; Ιστορική (HEMA); LARP; Σπάθη; Γενικής χρήσης/πολλαπλή; Επέ; Άλλο
lt-LT: Fechtavimo disciplina: Rapyra; Istorinis (HEMA); LARP; Kardas; Universalus / keli; Špaga; Kita
fr: Discipline d’escrime: Fleuret; Historique (AMHE); GN; Sabre; Universel/multiple; Épée; Autre
vi: Môn đấu kiếm: Kiếm liễu (Foil); Kiếm thuật lịch sử (HEMA); LARP; Kiếm chém (Sabre); Phổ thông/nhiều môn; Kiếm ba cạnh (Épée); Khác
th: กีฬาฟันดาบ: ฟอยล์; อิงประวัติศาสตร์ (HEMA); LARP; เซเบอร์; ครอบจักรวาล/หลายประเภท; เอเป้; อื่นๆ
ja: フェンシング競技: フルーレ; 史実剣術 (HEMA); LARP; サーブル; ユニバーサル/マルチ; エペ; その他
bg-BG: Дисциплина по фехтовка: Рапира; Историческа (HEMA); ЛАРП; Сабя; Универсална/множествена; Шпага; Друго
da: Fægtedisciplin: Fleuret; Historisk (HEMA); LARP; Sabel; Universel/flere; Kårde; Andet
sv: Stängseltyp: Florett; Historisk (HEMA); Lajv; Sabel; Universell/flera; Värja; Övrigt
ro-RO: Disciplina scrimei: Floretă; Istorică (HEMA); LARP; Sabie; Universală/multiple; Spadă; Altele
pl: Dyscyplina szermierki: Floret; Historyczna (HEMA); LARP; Szabla; Uniwersalna / wiele dyscyplin; Szpada; Inna
nb: Fektingdisiplin: Florett; Historisk (HEMA); LARP; Sabel; Universell / flere; Kårde; Annet
tr: Eskrim disiplini: Flöre; Tarihi (HEMA); LARP; Kılıç; Evrensel/çoklu; Epe; Diğer
sl-SI: Disciplina sabljanja: Floret; Zgodovinsko (HEMA); LARP; Sablja; Univerzalno/večnamensko; Meč; Drugo
it: Scherma: Fioretto; Storica (HEMA); LARP; Sciabola; Universale/multipla; Spada; Altra
ru: Дисциплина фехтования: Рапира; Историческое фехтование (HEMA); LARP; Сабля; Универсальная/несколько; Шпага; Другое
sk-SK: Šermiarska disciplína: Fleret; Historický (HEMA); LARP; Šabľa; Univerzálna/viacnásobná; Kord; Iná
fi: Miekkailulaji: Floretti; Historiallinen (HEMA); LARP; Säilä; Yleinen/useita; Kalpa; Muu
ko: 펜싱 세부 종목: 플뢰레; 역사적 무술(HEMA); LARP; 사브르; 공용/다중; 에페; 기타
de: Fechtdisziplin: Florett; Historisch (HEMA); LARP; Säbel; Universell/Mehrere; Degen; Sonstige